Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-201
Research and extension center west of 100th meridian; purpose; management.

For the furtherance and promotion of agricultural, horticultural, and forestry interests of this state, a research and extension center shall be established west of the one hundredth meridian in Nebraska, which center shall be under the control and management of the Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska.

Laws 1903, c. 114, § 1, p. 591;

R.S.1913, § 7135;

C.S.1922, § 6785;

C.S.1929, § 85-201;

R.S.1943, § 85-201;

Laws 1991, LB 663, § 74.

Experiment stations are a component part of the College of Agriculture of the University of Nebraska. State ex rel. Bushee v. Whitmore, 86 Neb. 399, 125 N.W. 606 (1910), modifying 85 Neb. 566, 123 N.W. 1051 (1909).